Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-310
Final adjournment; effect.

Upon any final adjournment of the court, all business not otherwise disposed of shall stand continued generally.

Laws 1879, § 34, p. 89;

R.S.1913, § 1169;

C.S.1922, § 1092;

C.S.1929, § 27-310;

R.S.1943, § 24-310.

Under section 24-310, R.R.S.1943, a trial court retains the authority to rule on a motion to vacate if the motion was made during the original term, even if none of the grounds listed in section 25-2001, R.R.S.1943, are met. Moackler v. Finley, 207 Neb. 353, 299 N.W.2d 166 (1980).